Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1338
National promotion on trade organization; board; powers.

The board may appropriate funds and become a member of any national promotion or trade organization that is necessary or advantageous for the carrying out of the duties of the board under the Ethanol Development Act.

Laws 1978, LB 424, § 20;

Laws 1981, LB 80, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-820;

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB815, § 10.
July 18, 2026